Washington statutes.
RCW 43.372.020

Marine interagency team.

(1) The office of the governor shall chair a marine interagency team that is composed of representatives of each of the agencies in the governor's natural resources cabinet with management responsibilities for marine waters, including the independent agencies. A representative from a federal agency with lead responsibility for marine spatial planning must be invited to serve as a liaison to the team to help ensure consistency with federal actions and policy. The team must assist state agencies under RCW 43.372.030 with the review and coordination of such planning with their existing and ongoing planning and conduct the marine management planning authorized in RCW 43.372.040.

(2) The team may not commence any activities authorized under RCW 43.372.030 and 43.372.040 until federal, private, or other funding is secured specifically for these activities.

[ 2012 c 252 s 1; 2010 c 145 s 3.]